North Carolina, session 2025, SB305.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Public Safety, Division of Emergency Management, the sum of three million dollars
($3,000,000) in recurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to expand and promote the
Community Emergency Response Team (CERT) program and training. The Division shall also
use a portion of these funds to establish a new program or expand an existing program to work
with local community organizations to conduct training sessions and to develop outreach
strategies to encourage community participation in these training programs.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*S305-v-1*